Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,127.01
Department of Correctional Services; provide services to Board of Pardons and Board of Parole.

The department, subject to available resources, shall provide all accounting, budgeting, and payroll services to the Board of Pardons and the Board of Parole at no expense to such boards.

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 13, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 677, § 14.